Georgia, session 2025_26, SB112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 10 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to selling and other
trade practices, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
S. B. 112
- 1 -

LC 60 0068
"ARTICLE 37
10-1-960.
As used in this article, the term 'HVAC' means heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning.
10-1-961.
(a) If a residential real property that includes an HVAC system as a fixture to the property
is conveyed to a new owner, any manufacturer's warranty in effect on that system or any
component of that system:
(1) Shall be automatically transferred to the new owner; and
(2) Shall continue in effect as if the new owner was the original purchaser of such system
or component, as applicable.
(b) A manufacturer shall continue to be obligated under the terms of any warranty
transferred pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section and shall not charge a fee for the
transfer of such warranty.
(c) A transfer of any manufacturer's warranty pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code
section shall not extend the remaining term of the warranty.
10-1-962.
(a) The full term of a manufacturer's, distributor's, or retailer's warranty of an HVAC
system or any component of such system shall be effective in this state on the date of
installation if installed by a contractor licensed under Chapter 14 of Title 43.
(b) If a manufacturer, distributor, or retailer of an HVAC system or any component of such
system provides a warranty or product registration card or form, or an electronic, online
warranty or product registration form, the card or form shall contain the following
information, displayed in a clear and conspicuous manner:
(1) The card or form is for registration of the product; and
S. B. 112
- 2 -

LC 60 0068
(2) Failure to complete and return the card or form shall not diminish any warranty rights
or decrease the warranty term.
(c) Any warranty of an HVAC system or any component of such system manufactured and
issued, sold, or offered for sale by a manufacturer, distributor, or retailer shall not be in any
way conditioned upon product registration."
SECTION 2.
(a) This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026.
(b) This Act shall apply to any warranty of an HVAC system or any component of such
system manufactured and issued, sold, or offered for sale by a manufacturer, distributor, or
retailer on or after the effective date of this Act and to any modifications or extensions of
such warranties issued, sold, or offered for sale on or after such date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 112
- 3 -